Maine, session 132, LD1403.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §11105, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 139, §1, is amended
to read:
2. Hunter safety course exemption for certain members of armed forces domiciled
in State individuals with required firearm training. A member of the Armed Forces of
the United States on active duty who is permanently stationed outside of the United States
and home on leave, a veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States, a law enforcement
officer and any individual who has completed a firearm training course as a requirement of
the individual's employment is exempt from hunter safety course requirements under
subsection 1 if that member individual shows proof at the time of application for the license
that that member's home state of record, as recorded in that person's military service
records, is Maine individual has completed a firearm training course as a requirement of
the individual's employment. A person who no longer meets the conditions for an
exemption under this subsection must satisfy the requirements of subsection 1.